parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/ITALIAN/FST/src/lex-features.lexc
!# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# Xerox Research Center Europe - Grenoble
!#
!# Copyright (C)  Xerox Corporation
!#
!# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# TYPE:	(x)fst
!# CONTENT:	modifications of morphological analyzer
!# LANGUAGE:	Italian
!# AUTHOR:	Anne Schiller, Giovanni Depau
!# CREATED:	20-Feb-2006
!#
!# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# USAGE: 	fst -s LEX.fst -e "read lex [ThisFile]" -l add-features.xfst
!# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

Multichar_Symbols
! lexical categories
+Conj
+Adv

! added features:
+Subord +Coord

^^ ! separator (must be put between lexical tags and added features !)

LEXICON ROOT 

!#########################################################################
! COORDINATIVE CONJUNCTIONS (and Adverbs):adding the feature "coord" 
allora+Adv^^+Coord	#;
anche+Adv^^+Coord	#;
anzi+Conj^^+Coord	#;
cioè+Conj^^+Coord	#;
dunque+Conj^^+Coord	#;
e+Conj^^+Coord		#;
ebbene+Conj^^+Coord	#;
eppure+Conj^^+Coord	#;
infatti+Conj^^+Coord	#;
invero+Conj^^+Coord	#;
ma+Conj^^+Coord		#;
né+Conj^^+Coord		#;
neanche+Adv^^+Coord	#;
nemmeno+Adv^^+Coord	#;
neppure+Adv^^+Coord	#;
nonché+Conj^^+Coord	#;
nondimeno+Conj^^+Coord	#;
o+Conj^^+Coord		#;
oppure+Conj^^+Coord	#;
ossia+Conj^^+Coord	#;
ovvero+Conj^^+Coord	#;
perciò+Conj^^+Coord	#;
però+Conj^^+Coord	#;
pertanto+Conj^^+Coord	#;
piuttosto+Adv^^+Coord	#;
pure+Adv^^+Coord	#;
quindi+Conj^^+Coord	#;
tuttavia+Conj^^+Coord	#;
!#vale a dire:+Adv^^+Coord	#;
!#e...e, o...o, n�...n�, sia...sia, non solo...ma anche


!#CONGIUNZIONI SUBORDINATIVE (ed Avverbi): adding the feature "subord"
a% condizione% che+Conj^^+Subord		#;
a% patto% che+Conj^^+Subord	#;
acciocché+Conj^^+Subord		#;
affinché+Conj^^+Subord		#;
allorché+Conj^^+Subord		#;
anche% se+Conj^^+Subord		#;
ancorché+Conj^^+Subord		#;
benché+Conj^^+Subord		#;
che+Conj^^+Subord		#;
eccetto% che+Conj^^+Subord	#;
finché+Conj^^+Subord		#;
fuorché+Conj^^+Subord		#;
giacché+Conj^^+Subord		#;
laddove+Conj^^+Subord		#;
mentre+Conj^^+Subord		#;
!#per% quanto+Conj^^+Subord	#;
perché+Conj^^+Subord		#;
poiché+Conj^^+Subord		#;
purché+Conj^^+Subord		#;
qualora+Conj^^+Subord		#;
quanto+Conj^^+Subord		#;
quantunque+Conj^^+Subord	#;
!#salvo% che+Conj^^+Subord	#;
se+Conj^^+Subord		#;
sebbene+Conj^^+Subord		#;
senza% che+Conj^^+Subord		#;
seppure+Conj^^+Subord		#;
siccome+Conj^^+Subord		#;
tranne% che+Conj^^+Subord	#;
come+Adv^^+Subord		#;
quando+Adv^^+Subord		#;
quasi+Adv^^+Subord		#;
!#visto% che
!#dal% momento% che
!#dato% che
!#per% il% fatto% che
!#nel% caso% che
!#malgrado% che
!#nonostante^^che
!#appena% che
!#dopo% che
!#ogni% volta% che
!#pi�% che
!#meno% che
!#meglio
!#peggio% che
!#tanto% quanto
!#tanto% pi�...quanto% meno
!#come% se
!#nel% modo% che
!#a% meno% che
!#per% quello% che

!!!######################################################################
